Mississippi, session 2026, HB522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Section 1, Chapter 393, Laws of 2019, is amended as follows: Section 1.  (1) The Mississippi Development Authority is authorized to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of, in whole or in part, in a manner as determined in the sole discretion of the authority, the following described real property and any improvements thereon: TRACT I DESCRIPTION #1: Commencing at a set nail in pavement at the SW 1/4 of the NW 1/4 of Section 15, T-18-S, R-18-W, Lowndes County, Mississippi; thence N88°35'46"E, a distance of 499.86 feet to the point of beginning and at state plane coordinate N1456560.6170 E1113430.5090, based on NAD-83, Mississippi East 2301 zone; from said point of beginning thence N00°45'46"W, a distance of 751.70 feet; thence N12°17'40"W, a distance of 169.79 feet; thence N05°28'05"W, a distance of 263.88 feet; thence N06°23'26"W, a distance of 152.45 feet; thence N87°58'02"E, a distance of 1,534.95 feet; thence S39°27'31"W, a distance of 1,076.12 feet; thence S50°32'29"E, a distance of 41.01 feet; thence S39°27'31"W, a distance of 669.20 feet; thence S88°02'45"W, a distance 368.41 feet to the point of beginning located in the NE 1/4 of the NW 1/4 and the NW 1/4 of the NE 1/4 of Section 15, T-18-S, R-18-W, Lowndes County, Mississippi and containing 28.4373 acres, more or less. TRACT II DESCRIPTION #1: Commencing at the SE corner of Block 11, lot 6 of the Interstate City Addition, City of Columbus; thence N27°15'13"E, a distance of 412.90 feet; thence N50°32'29"W, a distance of 159.57 feet; thence N50°32'29"W, a distance of 30.01 feet to the point of beginning and at state plane coordinate N1457279.0334 E1114792.1955, based on NAD-83, Mississippi East 2301 zone; from said point of beginning thence S37°48'10"W, a distance of 390.43 feet; thence N50°32'29"W, a distance of 246.76 feet; thence N39°27'31"E, a distance of 390.27 feet; thence S50°32'29"E, a distance of 235.48 feet to the point of beginning, located in the Block 12, lot 3, 4, 5 & 6 of the Interstate City Addition, City of Columbus and containing 2.1603 acres, more or less. TRACT II DESCRIPTION #2: Beginning and Commencing at the SE corner of Block 11, lot 6 of the Interstate City Addition, City of Columbus and at state plane coordinate N1456791.4860 E1114749.4870, based on NAD-83, Mississippi East 2301 zone; thence N50°32'29"W, a distance of 235.19 feet; thence N37°48'10"E, a distance of 403.74 feet; thence S50°32'29"E, a distance of 159.57 feet; thence S27°15'13"W, a distance of 412.90 feet to the point of beginning, located in the Block 11, lot 3, 4, 5 & 6 of the Interstate City Addition, City of Columbus and containing 1.8287 acres, more or less. (2)  The Mississippi Development Authority may pay the cost  of title search, perfection of title, title insurance, legal fees and recording fees and other costs as may be required to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of the property. (3) In the event that any or all of the real property and improvements described in subsection (1) of this section is sold, the real property * * *shall be sold for not less than the current fair market value as determined by the average of two (2) appraisals by qualified appraisers, one of whom shall be selected by the Department of Finance and Administration, and both of whom shall be certified and licensed by the Mississippi Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board may be sold for less than fair market value at the sole discretion of the Mississippi Development Authority. (4) Any proceeds from the sale of the land, and any improvements thereon, listed in subsection (1) of this section, shall be deposited into the * * *state land acquisition fund Mississippi Existing Industry Productivity Loan Program Bond Sinking Fund, established under Section 57-93-1, and administered by the Mississippi Development Authority. (5) The * * *Department of Finance and Administration Mississippi Development Authority may correct any discrepancies in the legal description of the property provided in this section. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.